Georgia, session 2025_26, HB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
13 SECTION 1.
14 Article 2A of Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
15 homestead option sales and use tax, is amended by adding a new part to read as follows:
- 1 -

25 LC 50 1265S
16 "Part 4
17 48-8-109.25.
18 (a) This part shall be known and may be cited as the 'Alternative Homestead Option Sales
19 and Use Tax Act of 2025.'
20 (b) As used in this part, the term:
21 (1) 'Existing municipality' means a municipality created prior to January 1, 2026, lying
22 wholly within or partially within a county.
23 (2) 'Homestead' means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40, with
24 the additional qualification that it shall include only the primary residence and not more
25 than five contiguous acres of land immediately surrounding such residence.
26 (3) 'Qualified municipality' means a municipality created on or after January 1, 2026,
27 lying wholly within or partially within a county.
28 (c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the proceeds of the alternative homestead
29 option sales and use tax be distributed equitably to the counties and qualified municipalities
30 such that the residents of a new incorporated municipality will continue to receive a benefit
31 from that tax substantially equal to the benefit they would have received if the area covered
32 by the municipality had not incorporated. The provisions of this part shall be liberally
33 construed to effectuate such intent.
34 48-8-109.26.
35 (a) Pursuant to the authority granted by Article IX, Section II, Paragraph VI of the
36 Constitution of this state, there are created within this state 159 special districts. The
37 geographical boundary of each county shall correspond with and shall be conterminous
38 with the geographical boundary of one of the 159 special districts.
39 (b)(1) When the imposition of a local sales and use tax is authorized according to the
40 procedures provided in this part within a special district, the county whose geographical
- 2 -

25 LC 50 1265S
41 boundary is conterminous with that of the special district shall levy a local sales and use
42 tax at the rate of 1 percent, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection. Except
43 as to rate, the local sales and use tax shall correspond to the tax imposed and administered
44 by Article 1 of this chapter. No item or transaction which is not subject to taxation by
45 Article 1 of this chapter shall be subject to the sales and use tax levied pursuant to this
46 part, except that the sales and use tax provided for in this part shall be applicable to sales
47 of motor fuels as prepaid local tax as such term is defined in Code Section 48-8-2 and
48 shall be applicable to the sale of food and food ingredients and alcoholic beverages only
49 to the extent provided for in paragraph (57) of Code Section 48-8-3.
50 (2) Such sales and use tax levied on sales of motor fuels as defined in Code
51 Section 48-9-2 shall be at the rate of 1 percent of the retail sales price of the motor fuel
52 which is not more than $3.00 per gallon.
53 (c) The proceeds of the sales and use tax levied and collected under this part shall be used
54 only for the purposes of funding capital outlay projects and of funding services within a
55 special district equal to the revenue lost to the homestead exemption as provided for in
56 Code Section 48-8-109.27, and, in the event excess funds remain following the expenditure
57 for such purposes, such excess funds shall be expended as provided in
58 subparagraph (c)(2)(C) of Code Section 48-8-109.27.
59 (d)(1) Such sales and use tax shall only be levied in a special district following the
60 enactment of a local Act which provides for a homestead exemption of an amount to be
61 determined from the amount of sales and use tax collected under this part. Such
62 exemption shall commence with taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of the year
63 immediately following the first complete calendar year in which the sales and use tax
64 under this part is levied. Any such local Act shall incorporate by reference the terms and
65 conditions specified under this part. Any such local Act shall not be subject to the
66 provisions of Code Section 1-3-4.1. Any such homestead exemption under this part shall
67 be in addition to and not in lieu of any other homestead exemption applicable to county
- 3 -

25 LC 50 1265S
68 taxes for county purposes within the special district. Notwithstanding any provision of
69 such local Act to the contrary, the referendum which shall otherwise be required to be
70 conducted under such local Act shall only be conducted if the resolution required under
71 this part is adopted prior to the issuance of the call for the referendum under the local Act
72 by the election superintendent. If such ordinance is not adopted by that date, the
73 referendum otherwise required to be conducted under the local Act shall not be
74 conducted.
75 (2) Such sales and use tax and the associated homestead exemption shall terminate ten
76 years after the date such sales and use tax is first collected; provided, however, that
77 nothing in this subsection shall prevent subsequent sales and use taxes or homestead
78 exemptions from being adopted pursuant to this part in the same manner as provided in
79 this part for the initial adoption of such sales and use tax and homestead exemption.
80 (3) No sales and use tax shall be levied in a special district under this part in which a tax
81 is levied and collected under Article 2 of this chapter.
82 (e) Whenever the governing authority of any county whose geographical boundary is
83 conterminous with that of the special district wishes to submit to the electors of the special
84 district the question of whether the sales and use tax authorized by this part shall be
85 imposed, any such governing authority shall notify the election superintendent of the
86 county whose geographical boundary is conterminous with that of the special district by
87 forwarding to the superintendent a copy of a resolution of the governing authority calling
88 for a referendum election. Upon receipt of the resolution, it shall be the duty of the election
89 superintendent to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question
90 of the imposition of the sales and use tax to the voters of the special district for approval
91 or rejection. The election superintendent shall issue the call and shall conduct the election
92 on a date and in the manner authorized under Code Section 21-2-540. Such election shall
93 only be conducted on the date of and in conjunction with a referendum provided for by
94 local Act on the question of whether to impose a homestead exemption within such county
- 4 -

25 LC 50 1265S
95 and based on the amount of proceeds from the sales and use tax levied and collected
96 pursuant to this part. The election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the
97 election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of the
98 election in the official organ of such county. The ballot shall have written or printed
99 thereon the following statement which shall precede the ballot question specified in this
100 subsection and the ballot question specified by the required local Act:
101 'NOTICE TO ELECTORS: Unless BOTH the alternative homestead exemption AND
102 the retail homestead option sales and use tax are approved, then neither the exemption nor
103 the sales and use tax shall become effective.'
104 Such statement shall be followed by the following:
105 '( ) YES Shall a retail homestead option sales and use tax of 1 percent be levied
106 within the special district within _____________ County for the
107 ( ) NO purposes of funding capital outlay projects and of funding services to
108 replace revenue lost to an additional homestead exemption of up to
109 100 percent of the assessed value of homesteads from county taxes for
110 county purposes?'
111 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the statement, ballot question,
112 and local Act ballot question referred to in this subsection shall precede any and all other
113 ballot questions calling for the levy or imposition of any other sales and use tax which are
114 to appear on the same ballot.
115 (f) All persons desiring to vote in favor of levying the sales and use tax shall vote 'Yes,'
116 and those persons opposed to levying the tax shall vote 'No.' If more than one-half of the
117 votes cast are in favor of levying the tax and approving the local Act providing such
118 homestead exemption, then the tax shall be levied in accordance with this part; otherwise,
119 the sales and use tax may not be levied, and the question of the imposition of the sales and
120 use tax may not again be submitted to the voters of the special district until after 24 months
121 immediately following the month in which the election was held. It shall be the duty of the
- 5 -

25 LC 50 1265S
122 election superintendent to hold and conduct such elections under the same rules and
123 regulations as govern special elections. It shall be the superintendent's further duty to
124 canvass the returns, declare the result of the election, and certify the result to the Secretary
125 of State and to the commissioner. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county
126 whose geographical boundary is conterminous with that of the special district holding the
127 election.
128 (g) If the imposition of the sales and use tax provided for in this part is approved in a
129 referendum election as provided by subsections (e) and (f) of this Code section, the
130 governing authority of the county whose geographical boundary is conterminous with that
131 of the special district shall adopt a resolution within 30 days after county certification of
132 the result of the election imposing the sales and use tax authorized by this part on behalf
133 of the county whose geographical boundary is conterminous with that of the special
134 district. The resolution shall be effective on the first day of the next succeeding calendar
135 quarter which begins more than 50 days after the adoption of the resolution. With respect
136 to services which are billed on a regular monthly basis, however, the resolution shall
137 become effective with the first regular billing period coinciding with or following the
138 otherwise effective date of the resolution. A certified copy of the resolution shall be
139 forwarded to the commissioner so that it will be received within five days after its
140 adoption.
141 (h) Within 30 days of the conclusion of a year in which the sales and use tax provided for
142 in this part is collected, the county shall post a report in a prominent place on its public
143 website detailing how much money was collected in the past year by such sales and use tax,
144 the value of homesteads reduced by such sales and use tax collections, and any other
145 information that may be required by the commissioner in rules adopted pursuant to
146 subsection (d) of Code Section 48-8-109.28. The county shall also deliver a copy of this
147 report to each member of the General Assembly whose district includes any part of the
148 county.
- 6 -

25 LC 50 1265S
149 48-8-109.27.
150 (a) The sales and use tax levied pursuant to this part shall be exclusively administered and
151 collected by the commissioner for the use and benefit of each county whose geographical
152 boundary is conterminous with that of a special district. Such administration and collection
153 shall be accomplished in the same manner and subject to the same applicable provisions,
154 procedures, and penalties provided in Article 1 of this chapter except that the sales and use
155 tax provided in this part shall be applicable to sales of motor fuels as prepaid local tax as
156 such term is defined in Code Section 48-8-2; provided, however, that all moneys collected
157 from each taxpayer by the commissioner shall be applied first to such taxpayer's liability
158 for taxes owed the state. Dealers shall be allowed a percentage of the amount of the sales
159 and use tax due and accounted for and shall be reimbursed in the form of a deduction in
160 submitting, reporting, and paying the amount due if such amount is not delinquent at the
161 time of payment. The deduction shall be at the rate and subject to the requirements
162 specified under subsections (b) through (f) of Code Section 48-8-50.
163 (b) Each sales and use tax return remitting sales and use taxes collected under this part
164 shall separately identify the location of each retail establishment at which any of the sales
165 and use taxes remitted were collected and shall specify the amount of sales and the amount
166 of taxes collected at each establishment for the period covered by the return in order to
167 facilitate the determination by the commissioner that all sales and use taxes imposed by this
168 part are collected and distributed according to situs of sale.
169 (c) The proceeds of the sales and use tax collected by the commissioner in each special
170 district under this part shall be disbursed as soon as practicable after collection as follows:
171 (1) One percent of the amount collected shall be paid into the general fund of the state
172 treasury in order to defray the costs of administration; and
173 (2) Except for the percentage provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the remaining
174 proceeds of the sales and use tax shall be distributed to the governing authority of the
175 county whose geographical boundary is conterminous with that of the special district. As
- 7 -

25 LC 50 1265S
176 a condition precedent for the authority to levy the sales and use tax or to collect any
177 proceeds from the tax authorized by this part for the year following the first complete
178 calendar year in which it is levied and for all subsequent years except the year following
179 the year in which the sales and use tax is terminated, the county whose geographical
180 boundary is conterminous with that of the special district shall, except as otherwise
181 provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 48-8-109.26, expend such proceeds as
182 follows:
183 (A) A portion of such proceeds shall be expended for the purpose of funding capital
184 outlay projects as follows:
185 (i) Prior to the beginning of each calendar year, the governing authority of the county
186 whose geographical boundary is conterminous with that of the special district shall
187 establish the capital factor which shall not exceed 0.250;
188 (ii) Capital outlay projects shall be funded in an amount equal to the product of the
189 capital factor multiplied by the net amount of the sales and use tax proceeds collected
190 under this part during the previous calendar year, and this amount shall be referred to
191 as capital outlay proceeds;
192 (iii) The total portion, if any, to be paid to existing municipalities from the capital
193 outlay proceeds shall be determined as follows:
194 (I) If the sales and use tax provided for in Part 1 of Article 3 of this chapter is
195 currently levied and collected within such county, such portions shall be determined
196 for each existing municipality by applying the percentage used for that
197 municipality's portion of the proceeds of such sales and use tax received by such
198 county from the commissioner in each month to the capital outlay portion of the
199 proceeds of the sales and use tax provided for by this article received from the
200 commissioner in the same month;
201 (II) If a new municipality is incorporated within the county, such newly
202 incorporated municipality shall receive a portion of each month's capital outlay
- 8 -

25 LC 50 1265S
203 proceeds that is equal to the population of such municipality within such county as
204 a percentage of the total population of the county, as such populations are
205 determined based upon the most recently published decennial United States Census,
206 and the portion of such capital outlay proceeds received by the county and the
207 existing municipalities shall be reduced in proportion to their populations within
208 such county; or
209 (III) If the sales and use tax provided for in Part 1 of Article 3 of this chapter is not
210 levied or collected within such county, the capital outlay portion of the sales and use
211 tax provided for in this article shall be distributed to the municipalities located
212 wholly or partially within the county based upon the populations of such
213 municipalities that are located within the county as a percentage of the total
214 population of such county, as such populations are determined based upon the most
215 recently published decennial United States Census; and
216 (iv) Capital outlay projects funded by this part undertaken by the county shall be
217 limited to road improvement projects; provided, however, that nothing in this division
218 shall limit the scope of capital outlay projects undertaken by a qualified municipality;
219 (B) A portion of such proceeds shall be expended for the purpose of funding services
220 within the special district equal to the revenue lost to the homestead exemption as
221 provided for in this Code section as follows:
222 (i) Within 30 days of the end of the calendar year, the governing authority of such
223 county shall calculate the homestead factor for that period by multiplying the quantity
224 1.000 minus the capital factor for that period, and then dividing by the taxes to be
225 levied in the current tax year for county maintenance and operations on only that
226 portion of the county's tax digest levied for maintenance and operations that
227 represents net assessments on qualified homestead property after all other homestead
228 exemptions have been applied, rounding the result to three decimal places;
- 9 -

25 LC 50 1265S
229 (ii) If the homestead factor is less than or equal to 1.000, the amount of homestead
230 exemption created for the current tax year under this part on qualified homestead
231 property shall be equal to the product of the homestead factor multiplied times the net
232 assessment of each qualified homestead remaining after all other homestead
233 exemptions have been applied; and
234 (iii) If the homestead factor is greater than 1.000, the homestead exemption created
235 for the current tax year by this part on qualified homestead property shall be equal to
236 the net assessment of each homestead remaining after all other homestead exemptions
237 have been applied; and
238 (C) If any of such proceeds remain following the distribution provided for in
239 subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph:
240 (i) The millage rate levied for county maintenance and operation purposes shall be
241 rolled back in an amount equal to such excess divided by the net taxable digest for
242 county purposes after deducting all homestead exemptions including the exemption
243 under this part; and
244 (ii) In the event the rollback created by division (i) of this subparagraph exceeds the
245 millage rate for county maintenance and operation purposes, the governing authority
246 of the county whose boundary is conterminous with the special district shall be
247 authorized to expend the surplus funds for funding all or any portion of those services
248 which are to be provided by such governing authorities pursuant to and in accordance
249 with Article IX, Section II, Paragraph III of the Constitution of this state.
250 (d) For illustration purposes, a hypothetical example of the calculation is provided as
251 follows:
252 First, calculate the homestead factor in accordance with
253 division (c)(2)(B)(i) of this Code section as follows:
254 (A) Capital factor certified by county as required by
255 subsection (c) of this Code section . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.15
- 10 -

25 LC 50 1265S
256 (B) Net amount of sales and use tax collected in the special
257 district pursuant to this part for the previous calendar year . . . . . $ 50 million
258 (C) Taxes levied for county purposes on only that portion of the
259 county tax digest that represents net assessments on qualified
260 homestead property after all other homestead exemptions have
261 been applied . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $100 million
262 (D) Calculation of homestead factor using figures above =
263 [(1-.0150)($50 million/$100 million)] . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.425.
264 48-8-109.28.
265 (a) Where a local sales or use tax has been paid with respect to tangible personal property
266 by the purchaser either in another local tax jurisdiction within this state or in a tax
267 jurisdiction outside this state, the sales and use tax may be credited against the sales and
268 use tax authorized to be imposed by this part upon the same property. If the amount of
269 sales or use tax so paid is less than the amount of the use tax due under this part, the
270 purchaser shall pay an amount equal to the difference between the amount paid in the other
271 tax jurisdiction and the amount due under this part. The commissioner may require such
272 proof of payment in another local tax jurisdiction as the commissioner deems necessary and
273 proper. No credit shall be granted, however, against the sales and use tax imposed under
274 this part for tax paid in another jurisdiction if the sales and use tax paid in such other
275 jurisdiction is used to obtain a credit against any other local sales and use tax levied in the
276 special district or in the county which is conterminous with the special district; and sales
277 and use taxes so paid in another jurisdiction shall be credited first against the sales and use
278 tax levied under this part and then against the sales and use tax levied under Article 3 of
279 this chapter, if applicable.
280 (b) No sales and use tax provided for in Code Section 48-8-109.26 shall be imposed upon
281 the sale of tangible personal property which is ordered by and delivered to the purchaser
- 11 -

25 LC 50 1265S
282 at a point outside the geographical area of the special district in which the sales and use tax
283 is imposed under this part regardless of the point at which title passes, if the delivery is
284 made by the seller's vehicle, United States mail, or common carrier or by private or contract
285 carrier licensed by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration or the Georgia
286 Department of Public Safety.
287 (c)(1) As used in this subsection, the term 'building and construction materials' means
288 all building and construction materials, supplies, fixtures, or equipment, any combination
289 of such items, and any other leased or purchased articles when the materials, supplies,
290 fixtures, equipment, or articles are to be utilized or consumed during construction or are
291 to be incorporated into construction work pursuant to a bona fide written construction
292 contract.
293 (2) No sales and use tax provided for in Code Section 48-8-109.26 shall be imposed in
294 a special district upon the sale or use of building and construction materials when the
295 contract pursuant to which the materials are purchased or used was advertised for bid
296 prior to approval of the levy of the sales and use tax by the county whose geographical
297 boundary is conterminous with that of the special district and the contract was entered
298 into as a result of a bid actually submitted in response to the advertisement prior to
299 approval of the levy of the sales and use tax.
300 (d) The commissioner shall have the power and authority to promulgate such rules and
301 regulations as shall be necessary for the effective and efficient administration and
302 enforcement of the collection of the sales and use tax authorized to be imposed by this
303 part."
304 SECTION 2.
305 Code Section 48-5C-1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to alternative ad
306 valorem taxation of motor vehicles and title ad valorem tax fee, is amended in subsection (b)
307 by repealing paragraph (7.1) and by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
- 12 -

25 LC 50 1265S
308 "(19)(A) As used in this paragraph, the term:
309 (i) 'For-hire charter bus or motor coach' means a motor vehicle designed for carrying
310 more than 15 passengers and used for the transportation of persons for compensation.
311 (ii) 'Special modified rental vehicle' means a motor vehicle that has been significantly
312 modified at a manufacturing facility in this state, provided that:
313 (I) Such manufacturing facility is operated by the owner of such motor vehicle;
314 (II) Such owner primarily uses such motor vehicle by renting or leasing it without
315 a driver to businesses;
316 (III) Such rental or lease transactions are subject to Georgia state and local sales
317 and use taxes; and
318 (IV) Such owner provides the department with an affidavit affirming that the
319 vehicle has been significantly modified and that the other qualifications of this
320 definition have been met for such vehicle.
321 (B) In the case of for-hire charter buses or motor coaches or special modified rental
322 vehicles, the person applying for a certificate of title shall be required to pay title ad
323 valorem tax fees in the amount of 50 percent of the amount which would otherwise be
324 due and payable under this subsection at the time of filing the application for a
325 certificate of title, and the remaining 50 percent shall be paid within 12 months
326 following the filing of such application."
327 SECTION 3.
328 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 13 -